Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. ORGANIZATION OF MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE A. TYPES OF MUNICIPALITIES

CHAPTER 6. TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

SUBCHAPTER A. INCORPORATION AS TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 6.001. AUTHORITY TO INCORPORATE AS TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. A community may incorporate under this subchapter as a Type A general-law municipality if it:

(1) constitutes an unincorporated city or town;

(2) contains 600 or more inhabitants; and

(3) meets the territorial requirements prescribed by Section 5.901.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 6.002. INCORPORATION PROCEDURE. The procedure for incorporating as a Type A general-law municipality is the same as that prescribed for incorporating as a Type B general-law municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 6.003. EFFECTIVE DATE OF INCORPORATION. The incorporation of the community as a municipality is effective on the date the county judge makes the entry, under Section 7.007, in the records of the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER B. CHANGE FROM ANOTHER MUNICIPAL TYPE TO TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 6.011. AUTHORITY TO CHANGE TO TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. (a) A municipality incorporated in any manner other than as a Type A general-law municipality may change to a Type A general-law municipality if the municipality:

(1) has 600 or more inhabitants;

(2) contains one or more manufacturing establishments within its corporate limits; or

(3) is incorporated under any law of the Republic of Texas.

(b) A municipality that makes the change shall operate under the law applying to a Type A general-law municipality instead of operating under any charter or law that previously governed the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 6.012. PROCEDURE FOR CHANGE. If a municipality wishes to change to a Type A general-law municipality:

(1) at least two-thirds of the governing body of the municipality at a regular meeting must vote to make the change and the vote must be recorded in the journal of the governing body's proceedings;

(2) a copy of the record of the proceedings must be signed by the mayor;

(3) a copy of the record of the proceedings must be attested by the municipality's clerk or secretary under the corporate seal; and

(4) a copy of the record of the proceedings must be filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the municipality is located.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 6.013. REPEAL OF LOCAL LAW AFTER CHANGE. Any local law that incorporated a municipality that changes to a Type A general-law municipality under this subchapter is repealed on the date on which the copy of the record of the proceedings is filed.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 6.014. CHANGE DOES NOT AFFECT PRIOR NAME OR STATUS AS BODY CORPORATE. A municipality that changes to a Type A general-law municipality retains the prior name by which it was known and continues to be a body corporate with perpetual succession.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.